District of Columbia statutes.
23-703

Failure to appear.

Any person released pursuant to section 23-702 who fails to appear as required shall be punished by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisonment for not more than five years, or both.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 632, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 283(c), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 23-703.
1973 Ed., § 23-703.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not exceeding $5,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 283(c) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.